District of Columbia statutes.
28-5108

Penalty.

An art dealer who violates § 28-5105 or § 28-5106 shall be liable to the artist in an amount equal to the actual damages, if any, including the incidental and consequential damages, sustained by the artist by reason of the violation, plus reasonable attorneys’ fees.

History

Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-310, § 9, 57 DCR 12392